Tennessee, session 114, HB1849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-203(a)(13)(A), is amended by
deleting the language "Notwithstanding any other public or private act to the contrary" and
substituting instead the language "Unless a county or municipal legislative body has voted to
establish the office of elected superintendent of schools pursuant to § 49-2-301(f)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-301(a), is amended by deleting
the word "Each" and substituting instead the language "Except as provided in subsection (f),
each".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-301, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
(f)
(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) or chapter 535 of the Public Acts of
1992 to the contrary, a county or municipality operating a school system may
establish the office of elected superintendent of schools by a majority vote of the
membership of the county or municipal legislative body.
(2)
(A) If the office of elected superintendent of schools is
established, then the contractual term of an appointed director of schools
must not be abridged by the establishment. If a county or municipality
chooses to conduct an election before the expiration of an incumbent
HB1849
010339
- 1 -

director's contract, then it is the responsibility of the county or municipal
legislative body to satisfy any contractual obligation to the incumbent
director of schools.
(B) A local board of education shall not appoint or extend the
contract or term of a director of schools after the county or municipality
establishes the office of elected superintendent of schools, but may
appoint a qualified person to serve as acting director until the office of
superintendent of schools is filled by the voters.
(3)
(A) The state board of education shall establish minimum
requirements for a license of qualification for a superintendent, which
must include, at a minimum, the following:
(i) The applicant must hold a teacher's professional
license with endorsement as principal or supervisor of instruction;
(ii) The applicant must hold a master's degree; and
(iii) The applicant must have at least five (5) years'
experience to include both teaching and administrative
experience.
(g) All rights, duties, or powers granted to an appointed director of schools,
unless otherwise provided in this title, are the rights, duties, or powers of an elected
superintendent for the LEA of a county or city that establishes the office of elected
superintendent of schools under subsection (f), and all references to an appointed
director of schools are references to an elected superintendent.
(h) An elected superintendent of schools is elected in the general election in
August and serves a term of four (4) years.
- 2 - 010339

SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 010339